Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 14 Remedy for Violation of Constitutional Rights
§ 7-14-107.
Appellate review.

Any final judgment or order entered upon a petition under this act may be reviewed by the supreme court on writ of certiorari upon the petition of either party pursuant to the Wyoming Rules of Appellate Procedure.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 63, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 7-408.7; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1988, ch. 46, § 1.

Cross references. —

For Wyoming Rules of Appellate Procedure, see the

Wyoming Court Rules Annotated.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 7-14-101(a).

Review of illegal sentence.

Appellate court could not review defendant's claim that the judgment
and sentence entered after he pleaded guilty were illegal under this
section due to the fact that he was not advised that his guilty pleas
could result in the disqualification of his right to possess firearms
pursuant to federal law because he raised it for the first time on
appeal; moreover, even if the claim had been raised before the district
court, it would have been barred by res judicata because the claim
could have been raised on direct appeal and in defendant's petition
for post-conviction relief.
Lunden v. State, 2013 WY 35,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Mar 20, 2013).

Only petitions in correct form considered. —

Final judgments or orders of a district court entered upon petitions filed pursuant to this chapter will be considered in the supreme court only if they are in the form required by Rule 13, W.R.A.P. Such petitions may be accompanied by a request that counsel be appointed. Smizer v. State, 763 P.2d 1254,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 1988).

State prisoner's Fed. R. Civ. P. 60(b)(1) motion was properly denied because the record made clear that his § 2254 petition was not timely filed under 28 U.S.C.S. § 2244(d) in that the district court properly included the entire time from the filing of the state postconviction motion to the eventual denial of certiorari of his conviction for bribery under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-5-102(a). An additional 45-days of statutory tolling was not required because the prisoner's appeal of the denial of postconviction relief was not the procedurally proper manner to seek review pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

7-14-107

and Wyo. R. App. P. 13.01(a).
Stanton v. Wyoming Ag,

2010 U.S. App. LEXIS 21199

(Oct. 14, 2010).

Applied

in

State ex rel. Hopkinson v. District Court, 696 P.2d 54,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 455

(Wyo. 1985).

Cited

in

Osborn v. Shillinger, 861 F.2d 612,

1988 U.S. App. LEXIS 14834

(10th Cir. 1988); Duran v. State, 949 P.2d 885,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 1997); Saunders v. Hornecker, 2015 WY 34,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Mar. 5, 2015).

§ 7-14-108.
Existing statutory provisions.

W.S.

7-14-101

through

7-14-108

shall not repeal any existing laws.

History.

Laws 1961, ch. 63, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 7-408.8; Laws 1987, ch. 157, § 3; 1988, ch. 46, § 1.

Cited

in

Albert v. Meacham, 458 P.2d 728,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 158

, 41 A.L.R.3d 1115 (Wyo. 1969); Albert v. State, 466 P.2d 826,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 1970); Smith v. State, 902 P.2d 1271,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 1995); Hauck v. State, 2007 WY 113, 162 P.3d 512,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(July 18, 2007).